apertium-ces-hbs.ces.dix
    <pardef n="každ/ý__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nov/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ějš</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialogov/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ějš</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chyt/rý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ří</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ří</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ro</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>řějš</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="če/ský__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sk</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sko</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sky</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štějš</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="něme/cký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ck</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cko</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtějš</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cky</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="evrop/ský__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sk</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sko</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štějš</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="exotermi/cký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ck</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cko</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtějš</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="novouč/ký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cí</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cí</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cel/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nej__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nej</l>
        <r>nej<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="každý"><i>každ</i><par n="každ/ý__det"/></e>
    <e lm="celý"><i>cel</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="novoučký"><p><l>novouč</l><r>nový</r></p><par n="novouč/ký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zlatý"><i>zlat</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="antický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>anti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="artézský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>artéz</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beletristický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>beletristi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="berberský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>berber</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="biskajský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>biskaj</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bulharský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>bulhar</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chytrý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>chyt</i><par n="chyt/rý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cvičný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>cvičn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dialogový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dialogov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zpětný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>zpětn</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diamantový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>diamantov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diskový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>diskov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrácký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dobrá</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dominikánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dominikán</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dovolený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dovolen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="epický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>epi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fotogenický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>fotogeni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="generální"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>generáln</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grafický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>grafi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hebrejský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>hebrej</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hloupý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>hloup</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="irácký"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>ira</l><r>irá</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jablečný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jablečn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jizerský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jizer</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kartézský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kartéz</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="komický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>komi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kostnatý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kostnat</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kozácký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kozá</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krizový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>krizov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="královský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>králov</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kyrgyzský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kyrgyz</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="křesťanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>křesťan</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liberecký"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>libere</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magnetofonový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>magnetofonov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malajsijský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>malajsij</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marketingový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>marketingov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marketinkový" r="LR"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>marketinkov</l><r>marketingov</r></p><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="metabolický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>metaboli</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mezilidský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>mezilid</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mistrný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>mistrn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mořský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>moř</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionalistický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nacionalisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionální"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nacionáln</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="německý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>něme</i><par n="něme/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="obdélníkový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>obdélníkov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="orientační"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>orientačn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="osmanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>osman</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pancéřový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>pancéřov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="partyzánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>partyzán</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="platonický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>platoni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="postmoderní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>postmodern</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pravicový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>pravicov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proevropský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>proevrop</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proletářský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>proletář</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rafinovaný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rafinovan</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rovinatý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rovinat</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slovenský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>sloven</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spravedlivý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>spravedliv</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tektonický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>tektoni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="termální"><par n="nej__adv"/><p><l>thermáln</l><r>termáln</r></p><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tkalcovský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>tkalcov</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="týmový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>týmov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vegetariánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vegetarián</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="víkendový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>víkendov</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wormský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>worm</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="úhlový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>úhlov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="český"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>če</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oddělený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>oddělen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rozcuchaný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rozcuchan</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sdílený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>sdílen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zahalený"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>zahalen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
